Mississippi statutes. Title 39. Libraries, Arts, Archives and History
Beauvior

§ 39-5-51.
Establishment of Jefferson Davis Shrine.

The complete custody, management, control and ownership of that portion of Beauvoir, (a tract of land comprising eighty-seven and one-half acres, more or less, in Harrison County, Mississippi, fronting 1020 feet, more or less, on the Gulf of Mexico, and situated approximately eight miles from the City of Gulfport, and four miles from the City of Biloxi, on “The Old Spanish Trail”, and being the same property conveyed the Mississippi division of the United Sons of Confederate Veterans on the 10th day of October, A. D. 1902, by Mrs. Varina Jefferson Davis, wife of Jefferson Davis, by deed of record in the land records of Harrison County, Mississippi, and said property being further described as the last home of Jefferson Davis, president of the Confederate States of America) lying west of a line running north and south from the southern to the northern boundary of said property and said line being equidistant between brick building on said property now used as an infirmary or hospital and the small frame building situated to the front and east of that building known as Beauvoir residence, and said small frame building being known as the office of Jefferson Davis and in which he wrote “The Rise and Fall of the Confederate Government” is hereby awarded and returned and completely relinquished by the State of Mississippi to the Mississippi division of the United Sons of Confederate Veterans, a Mississippi corporation, for the purpose of establishing and maintaining a shrine sacred to the memory of Jefferson Davis with full authority to do any and all things necessary in the discretion of the Mississippi division of the United Sons of Confederate Veterans for the establishment and maintenance of said shrine and for the beautification, repair, preservation, alteration or protection of said property herein awarded and relinquished to the Mississippi division of the United Sons of Confederate Veterans or any part thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7456; Laws, 1940, ch. 315.

§ 39-5-53.
Transfer of Beauvoir Veterans Home to United Sons of Confederate Veterans.

There is hereby declared to be a cessation of further need for that portion of Beauvoir known as the Veterans Home and the same is hereby transferred to the United Sons of Confederate Veterans in accordance with the deed of Mrs. Varina Davis, wife of Jefferson Davis, conveying Beauvoir to the Mississippi Division of the Sons of Confederate Veterans.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7447-01; Laws, 1955, Ex Sess, ch. 126, § 1, eff 60 days after passage (approved March 30, 1955).

§ 39-5-55.
Control and management of Jefferson Davis Shrine.

The control and management of Beauvoir, the Jefferson Davis Shrine, at Biloxi, Mississippi, shall be vested in the Board of Directors and Board of Trustees as provided for in the charter of incorporation of the Mississippi Division of the United Sons of Confederate Veterans as recorded by the Secretary of State on July 2, 1954, which charter being in accordance with the terms of the deed of Mrs. Varina Davis, dated October 10, 1902, whereby all title and control of Beauvoir is vested in the Mississippi Division of the United Sons of Confederate Veterans.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7460; Laws, 1940, ch. 315; Laws, 1955, Ex Sess, ch. 126, § 2, eff 60 days after passage (approved March 30, 1955).

§ 39-5-57.
Deposit of objects, documents, etc., in museum at Jefferson Davis Shrine.

The director of the department of archives and history is hereby authorized to deposit from time to time either in the residence at Beauvoir or in any building thereon maintained as a museum or library any objects, documents or archives which, in the opinion of said director, might be fittingly placed at Beauvoir. The director of the department of archives and history may, in his discretion, withdraw any object, document or archive so placed at Beauvoir. No object, document or archive shall be placed at Beauvoir by the director of the department of archives and history without the consent of the board of trustees of the Jefferson Davis Shrine referred to in section 39-5-55.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7459; Laws, 1940, ch. 315.